Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201181-1615
Nebraska Energy Code; exemptions.

The following shall be exempt from sections 81-1608 to 81-1626:

(1) Any building which has a peak design rate of energy usage for all
purposes of less than one watt, or three and four-tenths British Thermal Units
per hour, per square foot of floor area;

(2) Any building which is neither heated nor cooled;

(3) Any building or portion thereof which is owned by the United States
of America;

(4) Any manufactured home as defined by section 71-4603;

(5) Any modular housing unit as defined by subdivision (1) of section
71-1557; and

(6) Any building or
structure (a) that is listed on the state or National Register of Historic
Places, (b) that is designated as a historic property under local or state
designation law or survey, (c) that is certified as a contributing resource
with a National Register-listed or locally designated historic district, or
(d) with an opinion or certification that the property is eligible to be listed
on the state or National Register of Historic Places either individually or
as a contributing building to a historic district by the State Historic Preservation
Officer or the Keeper of the National Register of Historic Places.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 39;

Laws 1983, LB 124, § 16;

Laws 1985, LB 313, § 30;

Laws 2004, LB 888, § 9;

Laws 2011, LB329, § 8.
August 27, 2011